Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.751

Disposition of certain normal school fund revenues.

All moneys received from the lease or rental of lands set apart by the enabling act for state normal schools purposes; all interest or income arising from the proceeds of the sale of such lands or of the timber, fallen timber, stone, gravel, or other valuable material thereon, less the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160; and all moneys received as interest on deferred payments on contracts for the sale of such lands, shall from time to time be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, Western Washington University and The Evergreen State College capital projects accounts as herein provided to be expended for capital projects, and bond retirement purposes as set forth in RCW 28B.35.750, as now or hereafter amended. Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College shall be credited with one-fourth of the total amount beginning July 1, 2003. Beginning July 1, 1995, The Evergreen State College shall receive five percent of the total amount not obligated to repayment of bonds; Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, and Western Washington University shall receive equal amounts of the remaining amount. Beginning July 1, 1997, The Evergreen State College shall receive ten percent of the total amount not obligated to repayment of bonds; Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, and Western Washington University shall receive equal amounts of the remaining amount. Beginning July 1, 1999, The Evergreen State College shall receive fifteen percent of the total amount not dedicated to repayment of bonds; Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, and Western Washington University shall each receive equal amounts of the remaining amount. Beginning July 1, 2001, The Evergreen State College shall receive twenty percent of the total amount not obligated to repayment of bonds; Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, and Western Washington University shall each receive equal amounts of the remaining amount.

[ 1993 c 411 s 2; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 95; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 87; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.751. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 15; 1965 c 76 s 1. Formerly RCW 28B.40.751; 28.81.551.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 411: "The legislature finds that Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College are the state's comprehensive undergraduate institutions and each should share equally in the benefits derived from lands set apart in the enabling act for state normal school purposes." [ 1993 c 411 s 1.]

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.